Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2605
Board; members; per diem; expenses.

The members of the State Board of Health shall receive the sum of twenty dollars per diem, while actually engaged in the business of the board, and shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1953, c. 335, § 11, p. 1103;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 123;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 63.